California, session 20252026, SB1416.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 732 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:732. (a) A physician and surgeon and a dentist shall refund any amount that a patient has paid for services rendered that has subsequently been paid to the physician and surgeon or dentist by a third-party payor and that constitutes a duplicate payment. The refund shall be made as follows:(1) If the patient requests a refund, within 30 21 days following the request from that patient for a refund if the duplicate payment has been received, or within 30 21 days of receipt of the duplicate payment if the duplicate payment has not been received.(2) If the patient does not request a refund, within 90 days of the date the physician and surgeon or dentist knows, or should have known, of the receipt of the duplicate payment, the physician and surgeon or dentist shall notify the patient of the duplicate payment, and the duplicate payment shall be refunded within 30 21 days unless the patient requests that a credit balance be retained.(b) Violation of this section shall constitute unprofessional conduct. Disciplinary proceedings shall be conducted in accordance with the Medical Practice Act (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 2000)) or the Dental Practice Act (Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 1600)), as applicable.